Utah statutes.
26-1-2.   Definitions.

Subject to additional definitions contained in the chapters of this title which are applicable to specific chapters, as used in this title:

(1)  "Council" means the Utah Health Advisory Council.

(2)  "Department" means the Department of Health created in Section 26-1-4.

(3)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the department appointed pursuant to Section 26-1-8.

(4)  "Public health authority" means an agency or authority of the United States, a state, a territory, a political subdivision of a state or territory, an Indian tribe, or a person acting under a grant of authority from or contract with such an agency, that is responsible for public health matters as part of its official mandate.



Amended by Chapter 391, 2012 General Session

